src/third-party/hunspell-dictionaries/lt.aff
SFX Q  ias    tesnio           ias      
SFX Q  ias    tesniam          ias      
SFX Q  ias    tesn             ias      
SFX Q  ias    tesniu           ias      
SFX Q  ias    tesniame         ias      
SFX Q  ias    tesni            ias      
SFX Q  ias    tesni            ias      
SFX Q  ias    tesniems         ias      
SFX Q  ias    tesnius          ias      
SFX Q  ias    tesniais         ias      
SFX Q  ias    tesniuose        ias      
SFX Q  ias    tesn             ias      
SFX Q  ias    tesn s           ias      
SFX Q  ias    tesnei           ias      
SFX Q  ias    tesn             ias      
SFX Q  ias    tesne            ias      
SFX Q  ias    tesn je          ias      
SFX Q  ias    tesn ms          ias      
SFX Q  ias    tesnes           ias      
SFX Q  ias    tesn mis         ias      
SFX Q  ias    tesn se          ias      
SFX Q  ias    tesnysis         ias      
SFX Q  ias    tesniojo         ias      
SFX Q  ias    tesniajam        ias      
SFX Q  ias    tesn j           ias      
SFX Q  ias    tesniuoju        ias      
SFX Q  ias    tesniajame       ias      
SFX Q  ias    tesnieji         ias      
SFX Q  ias    tesni j          ias      
SFX Q  ias    tesniesiems      ias      
SFX Q  ias    tesniuosius      ias      
SFX Q  ias    tesniaisiais     ias      
SFX Q  ias    tesniuosiuose    ias      
SFX Q  ias    tesnioji         ias      
SFX Q  ias    tesniosios       ias      
SFX Q  ias    tesniajai        ias      
SFX Q  ias    tesni j          ias      
SFX Q  ias    tesni ja         ias      
SFX Q  ias    tesniojoj        ias      
SFX Q  ias    tesniojoje       ias      
SFX Q  ias    tesniosioms      ias      
SFX Q  ias    tesni sias       ias      
SFX Q  ias    tesniosiomis     ias      
SFX Q  ias    tesniosiose      ias      
SFX Q d ias   desnis          d ias     
SFX Q d ias   desnio          d ias     
SFX Q d ias   desniam         d ias     
SFX Q d ias   desn            d ias     
SFX Q d ias   desniu          d ias     
SFX Q d ias   desniame        d ias     
SFX Q d ias   desni           d ias     
SFX Q d ias   desni           d ias     
SFX Q d ias   desniems        d ias     
SFX Q d ias   desnius         d ias     
SFX Q d ias   desniais        d ias     
SFX Q d ias   desniuose       d ias     
SFX Q d ias   desn            d ias     
SFX Q d ias   desn s          d ias     
SFX Q d ias   desnei          d ias     
SFX Q d ias   desn            d ias     
SFX Q d ias   desne           d ias     
SFX Q d ias   desn je         d ias     
SFX Q d ias   desn ms         d ias     
SFX Q d ias   desnes          d ias     
SFX Q d ias   desn mis        d ias     
SFX Q d ias   desn se         d ias     
SFX Q d ias   desnysis        d ias     
SFX Q d ias   desniojo        d ias     
SFX Q d ias   desniajam       d ias     
SFX Q d ias   desn j          d ias     
SFX Q d ias   desniuoju       d ias     
SFX Q d ias   desniajame      d ias     
SFX Q d ias   desnieji        d ias     
SFX Q d ias   desni j         d ias     
SFX Q d ias   desniesiems     d ias     
SFX Q d ias   desniuosius     d ias     
SFX Q d ias   desniaisiais    d ias     
SFX Q d ias   desniuosiuose   d ias     
SFX Q d ias   desnioji        d ias     
SFX Q d ias   desniosios      d ias     
SFX Q d ias   desniajai       d ias     
SFX Q d ias   desni j         d ias     
SFX Q d ias   desni ja        d ias     
SFX Q d ias   desniojoj       d ias     
SFX Q d ias   desniojoje      d ias     
SFX Q d ias   desniosioms     d ias     
SFX Q d ias   desni sias      d ias     
SFX Q d ias   desniosiomis    d ias     
SFX Q d ias   desniosiose     d ias     
SFX Q us      esnis           us        
SFX Q us      esnio           us        
SFX Q us      esniam          us        
SFX Q us      esn             us        
SFX Q us      esniu           us        
SFX Q us      esniame         us        
SFX Q us      esni            us        
SFX Q us      esni            us        
SFX Q us      esniems         us        
SFX Q us      esnius          us        
SFX Q us      esniais         us        
SFX Q us      esniuose        us        
SFX Q us      esn             us        
SFX Q us      esn s           us        
SFX Q us      esnei           us        
SFX Q us      esn             us        
SFX Q us      esne            us        
SFX Q us      esnioje         us        
SFX Q us      esn ms          us        
SFX Q us      esnes           us        
SFX Q us      esn mis         us        
SFX Q us      esn se          us        
SFX Q us      esnysis         us        
SFX Q us      esniojo         us        
SFX Q us      esniajam        us        
SFX Q us      esn j           us        
SFX Q us      esniuoju        us        
SFX Q us      esniajame       us        
SFX Q us      esnieji         us        
SFX Q us      esni j          us        
SFX Q us      esniesiems      us        
SFX Q us      esniuosius      us        
SFX Q us      esniaisiais     us        
SFX Q us      esniuosiuose    us        
SFX Q us      esnioji         us        
SFX Q us      esniosios       us        
SFX Q us      esniajai        us        
SFX Q us      esni j          us        
SFX Q us      esni ja         us        
SFX Q us      esniojoj        us        
SFX Q us      esniojoje       us        
SFX Q us      esniosioms      us        
SFX Q us      esni sias       us        
SFX Q us      esniosiomis     us        
SFX Q us      esniosiose      us        
SFX Q is       lesnis         is        
SFX Q is       lesnio         is        
SFX Q is       lesniam        is        
SFX Q is       lesn           is        
SFX Q is       lesniu         is        
SFX Q is       lesniame       is        
SFX Q is       lesni          is        
SFX Q is       lesni          is        
SFX Q is       lesniems       is        
SFX Q is       lesnius        is        
SFX Q is       lesniais       is        
SFX Q is       lesniuose      is        
SFX Q is       lesn           is        
SFX Q is       lesn s         is        
SFX Q is       lesnei         is        
SFX Q is       lesn           is        
SFX Q is       lesne          is        
SFX Q is       lesn je        is        
SFX Q is       lesn ms        is        
SFX Q is       lesnes         is        
SFX Q is       lesn mis       is        
SFX Q is       lesn se        is        
SFX Q is       lesnysis       is        
SFX Q is       lesniojo       is        
SFX Q is       lesniajam      is        
SFX Q is       lesn j         is        
SFX Q is       lesniuoju      is        
SFX Q is       lesniajame     is        
SFX Q is       lesnieji       is        
SFX Q is       lesni j        is        
SFX Q is       lesniesiems    is        
SFX Q is       lesniuosius    is        
SFX Q is       lesniaisiais   is        
SFX Q is       lesniuosiuose  is        
SFX Q is       lesnioji       is        
SFX Q is       lesniosios     is        
SFX Q is       lesniajai      is        
SFX Q is       lesni j        is        
SFX Q is       lesni ja       is        
SFX Q is       lesniojoj      is        
SFX Q is       lesniojoje     is        
SFX Q is       lesniosioms    is        
SFX Q is       lesni sias     is        
SFX Q is       lesniosiomis   is        
SFX Q is       lesniosiose    is        
SFX Q ys       lesnis         ys        
SFX Q ys       lesnio         ys        
SFX Q ys       lesniam        ys        
SFX Q ys       lesn           ys        
SFX Q ys       lesniu         ys        
SFX Q ys       lesniame       ys        
SFX Q ys       lesni          ys        
SFX Q ys       lesni          ys        
SFX Q ys       lesniems       ys        
SFX Q ys       lesnius        ys        
SFX Q ys       lesniais       ys        
SFX Q ys       lesniuose      ys        
SFX Q ys       lesn           ys        
SFX Q ys       lesn s         ys        
SFX Q ys       lesnei         ys        
SFX Q ys       lesn           ys        
