src/third-party/hunspell-dictionaries/lt.dic
absurdi kas/ANQ
aidus/ANQ
ai us/ANQ
akylas/ANQ
akstinuotas/ANQ
alegori kas/ANQ
alpus/ANQ
ambivalenti kas/ANQ
angeli kas/ANQ
ank tingas/ANQ
antgamti kas/ANQ
ant mogi kas/ANQ
apgail tinas/ANQ
apkalbus/ANQ
apoliti kas/ANQ
apvalainas/ANQ
archaji kas/ANQ
artisti kas/ANQ
asketi kas/ANQ
atatupstas/ANQ
atgodus/ANQ
atkilas/ANQ
atlinkas/ANQ
at ai us/ANQ
atskaitingas/ANQ
atvalgus/ANQ
at valgus/ANQ
auk taiti kas/ANQ
autenti kas/ANQ
bailus/ANQ
balsingas/ANQ
banalus/ANQ
basnir ias/ANQ
b dingas/ANQ
beproti kas/ANQ
beskoni kas/ANQ
bi iuli kas/ANQ
blak tas/ANQ
blogas/ANQ
brangus/ANQ
brutalus/ANQ
bukaproti kas/ANQ
chaoti kas/ANQ
civilizuotas/ANQ
daiguotas/ANQ
daktari kas/ANQ
dantuotas/ANQ
darkus/ANQ
daugiareik mi kas/ANQ
debesuotas/ANQ
dekoratyvus/ANQ
derlingas/ANQ
de inas/ANQ
d tas/ANQ
didokas/ANQ
diletanti kas/ANQ
dir ingas/ANQ
dygus/ANQ
doringas/ANQ
dramati kas/ANQ
dr sus/ANQ
dr gmingas/ANQ
dry  tas/ANQ
drumzlinas/ANQ
dr tas/ANQ
d kus/ANQ
dumblingas/ANQ
duoni kas/ANQ
du us/ANQ
dvigubas/ANQ
dvynas/ANQ
efektyvus/ANQ
eikvus/ANQ
ekspansyvus/ANQ
ekvivalentus/ANQ
emaliuotas/ANQ
epizodi kas/ANQ
er k  iuotas/ANQ
europieti kas/AQ
fantasti kas/ANQ
finansi kas/ANQ
fragmenti kas/ANQ
gairingas/ANQ
gaivus/ANQ
galviji kas/ANQ
garbanotas/ANQ
garsingas/ANQ
gaudus/ANQ
geibus/ANQ
gelsvas/ANQ
geografi kas/ANQ
giedras/ANQ
gimtas/ANQ
gi lus/ANQ
gyvybingas/ANQ
gleiv tas/ANQ
glotnas/ANQ
gob us/ANQ
grafi kas/ANQ
grandi kas/ANQ
greitas/ANQ
grib tus/ANQ
griuvus/ANQ
grubl tas/ANQ
gruzdus/ANQ
gumburiuotas/ANQ
gvaldus/ANQ
idealus/ANQ
ilgas/ANQ
impozanti kas/ANQ
informatyvus/ANQ
inteligenti kas/ANQ
irus/ANQ
i drikas/ANQ
i kalbingas/ANQ
i laidingas/ANQ
i na us/ANQ
i r gotas/ANQ
isteri kas/ANQ
i  aras/ANQ
ypatus/ANQ
jaurus/ANQ
jukus/ANQ
juokingas/ANQ
juslus/ANQ
kairys/ADNQ
kalbus/ANQ
kalnus/ANQ
kamanotas/ANQ
kanceliarinis/BNQ
kaprizingas/ANQ
karpytas/ANQ
kar ygi kas/ANQ
kauk tas/ANQ
keistas/ANQ
keliaklupstas/ANQ
kenksmingas/ANQ
kert tas/ANQ
keturp s ias/ANQ
kibus/ANQ
kilnia irdi kas/ANQ
kintamas/ANQ
klaidingas/ANQ
klausus/ANQ
klijingas/ANQ
klump tas/ANQ
knibus/ANQ
kolegi kas/ANQ
kompleksi kas/ANQ
konkurentabilus/ANQ
korekti kas/ANQ
kosulingas/ANQ
kratus/ANQ
kreivas/ANQ
krienuotas/ANQ
kroati kas/AQ
krutus/ANQ
kult ringas/ANQ
kuok tuotas/ANQ
kurp tas/ANQ
kvalifikuotas/ANQ
laibokas/ANQ
laiptuotas/ANQ
lajus/ADNQ
languotas/ANQ
latvi kas/ANQ
legalus/ANQ
lengvab di kas/ANQ
l tas/ANQ
lieknas/ADNQ
lie uvingas/ANQ
linksmokas/ANQ
lygne as/ANQ
luk tuotas/ANQ
makotas/ANQ
markus/ANQ
maurinas/ANQ
m giamas/ANQ
m nes tas/ANQ
metodi kas/ANQ
miltinas/ANQ
mi kuotas/ANQ
mokus/ANQ
muiluotas/ANQ
naikus/ANQ
naujovi kas/ANQ
negird tas/ANQ
nelemtas/ANQ
nepakartojamas/ANQ
nesuskaitomas/ANQ
niek i kas/ANQ
nokus/ANQ
nuodingas/ANQ
nuo alus/ANQ
nuo valgus/ANQ
organi kas/ANQ
pad ki kas/ANQ
pailgas/ANQ
pakasus/ANQ
pal vas/ANQ
paraly iuotas/AQ
pasal ni kas/ANQ
paskiausias/ANQ
pastovus/ANQ
pavaizdus/ANQ
pavojus/ADNQ
penkeriopas/ANQ
p s ias/ANQ
piktd iugi kas/ANQ
pirkli kas/ANQ
plauki kas/ANQ
plok  ias/ANQ
populiarus/ANQ
prakaulus/ANQ
prantus/ANQ
prekingas/ANQ
prie d l tas/ANQ
priklausomas/ANQ
problemi kas/ANQ
prozi kas/ANQ
pur tas/ANQ
putrinas/ANQ
rai kus/ANQ
rasotas/ANQ
rauzganas/ANQ
rekordi kas/AQ
retokas/ANQ
ringiuotas/ANQ
roji kas/ANQ
rumb tas/ANQ
ruzganas/ANQ
s lygi kas/ANQ
sarkasti kas/ANQ
savaranki kas/ANQ
s vokus/ANQ
senberni kas/ANQ
siautingas/ANQ
simboli kas/ANQ
skaidus/ANQ
skaudulingas/ANQ
skyl tas/ANQ
skrituli kas/ANQ
slapus/ANQ
sluoksniuotas/ANQ
smiglus/ANQ
snargliuotas/ANQ
sopuliuotas/ANQ
spirali kas/ANQ
sp dus/ANQ
stabmeldi kas/ANQ
statokas/ANQ
storokas/ANQ
s drus/ANQ
suomi kas/ANQ
svaigulingas/ANQ
sviestuotas/ANQ
tamsuoli kas/ANQ
tarpus/ANQ
teis tas/ANQ
tepnus/ANQ
tikras/ANQ
t slus/ANQ
totalus/ANQ
traukus/ANQ
trivialus/ANQ
t las/ANQ
tvanus/ANQ
unikalus/ANQ
up tas/ANQ
u gaulus/ANQ
vagotas/ANQ
vai us/ANQ
valyvas/ANQ
vargdieni kas/ANQ
varus/ANQ
veidrodi kas/ANQ
velyki kas/ANQ
verkus/ANQ
ver lus/ANQ
vienalaikis/BNQ
vienodas/ANQ
vilki kas/ANQ
virpulingas/ANQ
vitaminingas/ANQ
voratinkli kas/ANQ
